District of Columbia statutes.
19-1518

Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this Uniform Act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History

Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-205, § 2(b), 53 DCR 9063

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 18 of the Uniform Disclaimer of Property Interests Act (1999).